Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-318] Finality of determinations.
The determinations required by sections 103D-302(g), 103D-303(a), 103D-303(g),
103D-306, 103D-307, 103D-310, 103D-312(c), 103D-313, and 103D-314 shall be
final and conclusive unless they are clearly erroneous, arbitrary, capricious,
or contrary to law. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next